Arkansas, session 2025, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
(a) The General Assembly intends for this act to prohibit
discrimination by public entities on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity, or national origin.
(b) The General Assembly does not intend for this act to affect any
preferences provided to veterans under the law based on their status as a
veteran.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-4-223 is amended to read as follows:
3-4-223. Diversity in ownership and financial interest.
When issuing a permit under Title 3 of the Arkansas Code, the Alcoholic
Beverage Control Division shall consider lack of diversity in ownership and
financial interest in the geographic area at issue in the permit application
the benefit of competition to consumers.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-10-111 is amended to read as follows:
*JLL011*
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
6-10-111. Equity Equality Assistance Center.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education is authorized
to establish a special section within its organization, to be known as the
Equity Equality Assistance Center, designed to provide assistance to the
school districts of the state in such activities as affirmative action,
program accessibility, human relations, awareness, and desegregation and
nondiscrimination.
(b) This assistance shall include on-site visits, workshops, program
review, and any other special activity which might enable the school
districts of the state to more effectively meet their civil rights
desegregation and nondiscrimination responsibilities.
(c)(1) The center created by this section shall be the liaison for the
division with the United States Office for Civil Rights.
(2) The center shall maintain manuals, guidelines, procedures,
and other informational materials setting requirements in the area of civil
rights desegregation and nondiscrimination and describing how determination
of compliance is made.
(d) Annually, each local school district in the state shall provide
the center assurances of compliance with civil rights desegregation and
nondiscrimination responsibilities in the form and at the time as is
designated by the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(e) The division may withhold state aid from any school district that
fails to file its assurance of compliance with civil rights desegregation and
nondiscrimination responsibilities by October 15 each year or fails to file
any other information with a published deadline requested from school
districts by the center so long as thirty (30) calendar days are given
between the request for the information and the published deadline, except
that thirty (30) days notice shall not be required when the request comes
from a member or committee of the General Assembly.
(f) The division is authorized to develop forms and promulgate
appropriate rules and procedures as may be required to implement the
provisions of this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-15-202(f)(1), concerning school
accreditation, development of rules, criteria, and standards, is amended to
read as follows:
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
(1) Section 6-10-111(d)-(f) concerning the Equity Equality
Assistance Center;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 19, is
repealed.
6-17-1901. Teacher and administrator recruitment and retention plan.
(a) By August 1, 2022, each public school district and open-enrollment
public charter school in the state shall prepare a three-year teacher and
administrator recruitment and retention plan.
(b) The plan shall set forth goals for:
(1) The recruitment and retention of teachers and administrators
of minority races and ethnicities who increase diversity among the district
staff and, at a minimum, reflect the racial and ethnic diversity of the
district's students; and
(2) Increasing the number of students who pursue careers in
education with an emphasis on students of minority races and ethnicities.
(c) A school district shall review annually the:
(1) Recruitment and retention plan; and
(2) Progress of the school district in meeting the goals
established pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The plan shall be:
(1) Updated annually; and
(2) Posted on the school district's or open-enrollment public
charter school's website no later than August 1 of each year.

6-17-1902. Equity Assistance Center — Coordination and contents of
plan.
(a) The Equity Assistance Center shall provide technical assistance,
guidance, and support to public school districts and public open-enrollment
charter schools in developing recruitment and retention plans and setting and
meeting annual goals.
(b)(1) Each public school district and open-enrollment public charter
school shall designate an employee to coordinate the implementation and
review of the public school district's and open-enrollment public charter
school's recruitment and retention plan.
(2) The designated equity assistance coordinator in each public
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
school district and open-enrollment public charter school may serve as the
coordinator of the public school district's and open-enrollment public
charter school's recruitment and retention plan.
(c) The teacher and administrator recruitment and retention plan shall
include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(1) The annual goals of the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school established pursuant to § 6-17-1901(b);
(2) The actions and steps the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school has taken and will take to meet each of the
public school district's and open-enrollment public charter school's goals;
(3) The progress of the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school in meeting each of the public school
district's and open-enrollment public charter school's goals;
(4) The evaluative methods the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school will use to measure progress towards meeting
the public school district's or open-enrollment public charter school's
goals;
(5) If the public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school did not meet the public school district's or open-enrollment
public charter school's goals for the previous reporting period, the public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school shall state the
reasons for not meeting the goals and the steps the public school district or
open-enrollment public charter school will take to overcome the reasons for
not meeting the goals;
(6) The steps the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school will take to encourage students to pursue a career in
education, including steps specific to students of minority races and
ethnicities;
(7) Public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school teacher and administrator recruitment and retention data to show the:
(A) Racial and ethnic composition of teachers and
administrators employed by the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school for each of the previous three (3) years; and
(B) Effectiveness of the plan; and
(8) The racial and ethnic composition of the student body and
the racial and ethnic composition of the residents of the public school
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
district or open-enrollment public charter school.
(d) The State Board of Education may promulgate rules necessary for
implementation of this subchapter.

6-17-1903. Department of Education — Minority Teacher and Administrator
Preparation and Recruitment Strategic Plan.
(a)(1) The Department of Education shall set goals for increasing the
number of teachers and administrators of minority races and ethnicities in
this state.
(2)(A) The Division of Higher Education shall collaborate with
the State Board of Education, local universities, colleges, public school
districts, and open-enrollment public charter schools to develop a strategic
plan for increasing the number of teachers and administrators of minority
races and ethnicities in this state.
(B) The Minority Teacher and Administrator Preparation and
Recruitment Strategic Plan shall include without limitation recommendations
to institutions with educator preparation programs on ways to:
(i) Identify methods for increasing the percentage
of teachers and administrators of minority races and ethnicities in
proportion to the number of students of minority races and ethnicities in
this state; and
(ii) Establish programs to identify and recruit
individuals of minority races and ethnicities who have already earned college
degrees in other job fields to become teachers and administrators.
(b) The division shall:
(1) Promote educator preparation programs that increase the
percentage of individuals of minority races and ethnicities who enter and
successfully complete a four-year educator preparatory program and provide
support to students of minority races and ethnicities who meet the
requirements for entering educator preparation programs; and
(2) Submit a report no later than July 1, 2022, and every two
(2) years following to the House Committee on Education and the Senate
Committee on Education.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(3), concerning the
Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, is repealed.
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
(3) Every five (5) years, beginning in 2015:
(A) Minority retention plans, § 6-61-122; and
(B) Affirmative action program plans, § 6-63-103(c).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code §§ 6-61-121 and 6-61-122 are repealed.
6-61-121. Higher education minority retention programs — Definition.
For purposes of this section and § 6-61-122, the term “minority” refers
to African-Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Native
Americans.

6-61-122. Higher education minority retention programs — Establishment
— Reports.
(a) All state-supported colleges and universities shall establish a
program for the retention of blacks and other members of minority groups as
students, faculty, and staff. Retention action plans shall be prepared on a
continuing basis for future five-year periods.
(b) Each state-supported college and university shall annually prepare
a progress report on the steps that have been taken to reach the goals of the
plan. The report shall include information relative to students, faculty, and
staff within the institution.
(c) Copies of each institution's five-year plan and annual report
shall be filed by June 30 with the Division of Higher Education, the board of
trustees of the institution, the House Committee on Education and the Senate
Committee on Education, and the board of visitors of the institution, if
applicable.
(d) The division shall develop appropriate forms for reporting and
shall monitor the retention plans and annual reports.
(e) In carrying out the retention action plans, each institution shall
provide for a part-time or full-time employee by reassignment, appointment,
or employment to assist the institution in the retention of blacks and
members of other minority groups for faculty and staff positions.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-63-103 is repealed.
6-63-103. Affirmative action programs — Plans — Annual reports.
(a)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare an affirmative action program for the recruitment of African-
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
Americans and other members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and
for enrollment as students.
(2) Affirmative action plans shall be prepared on a continuing
basis for future five-year periods.
(b)(1) Each state-supported institution of higher education shall
prepare annually a summary report on the steps that have been taken to reach
the goals of the plan.
(2) The report shall:
(A) Include information on the progress made by each
institution for the various levels of employment within the institution; and
(B) Be presented in a table format limited to no more than
five (5) pages.
(c) Copies of the five-year plan and annual reports summaries of each
institution of higher education shall be included in the Comprehensive
Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, filed with the Governor, the
Division of Higher Education, the president and board of trustees of the
institution, the board of visitors of the institution, if applicable, and the
House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education.
(d) In carrying out the affirmative action plans, each institution of
higher education shall provide for a part-time or full-time employee to
assist the institution in the recruitment of African-Americans and other
members of minorities for faculty and staff positions and for enrollment as
students.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1501 is amended to read as follows:
6-82-1501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Geographical Critical Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program Act of
2001”.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1502 is amended to read as follows:
6-82-1502. Program established — Purpose — Effect.
(a) There is established the Critical Needs Minority Teacher
Scholarship Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to attract qualified minority
teachers to the Delta and those geographical areas of the state where there
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
exists a critical shortage of teachers by awarding scholarships to minorities
individuals declaring an intention to serve in the teaching field who
actually render service to this state while possessing an appropriate
teaching license.
(c) This subchapter does not affect any preference given to veterans
in public education.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1503(a) and (b), concerning the
eligibility for scholarships, are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The term “minority” when used in this subchapter shall refer to
Black Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Native Americans.
(2) The Native American group includes all persons having
origins in any of the original peoples of North America and who maintain
cultural identification through tribal affiliation or community recognition.
(b) Any individual who is a minority and who is enrolled in or
accepted for enrollment at a baccalaureate degree-granting institution of
higher education whose teacher education program is approved by the State
Board of Education or at an accredited state-supported community college in
the State of Arkansas who expresses in writing an intention to teach in a
geographical area of the state in which there exists a critical shortage of
teachers, as designated by the state board, shall be eligible for a financial
Critical Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship to be applied toward the costs of
the individual's college education, if:
(1) The applicant has a grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0
scale in high school if the applicant graduated within the five (5) preceding
years; and
(2) The applicant scored nineteen (19) or above on the ACT
composite or the equivalent as defined by the University of Arkansas at Pine
Bluff.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1503(c)(1), concerning the
eligibility for scholarships, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The university is authorized to develop selection criteria
through Critical Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program rules, which
combine an applicant's ACT superscore, as defined by § 6-85-204, or ACT
equivalent score and grade point average in the core curriculum into a
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
selection index.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1503(e)(1), concerning the
eligibility for scholarships, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Awards granted under the Critical Needs Minority Teacher
Scholarship Program shall be available to both full-time and part-time
students.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1504(a), concerning service
requirement for scholarship recipients, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Except in those cases where employment positions may not be
available upon completion of licensure requirements, at the beginning of the
first school year in which a recipient of a Critical Needs Minority Teacher
Scholarship is eligible for employment as a licensed teacher, that person
shall begin to render service as a licensed teacher in a public school
district in a geographical area of the state where there is a critical
shortage of teachers or in the Mississippi Delta, as designated by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1505(a), concerning rules,
administration, and reports for the administration of the Critical Needs
Minority Teacher Scholarship Program, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff and the Division of
Higher Education shall jointly promulgate rules necessary for the proper
administration of the Critical Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1506(a), concerning the Critical
Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program Committee, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) There is established a committee to be known as the Critical Needs
Minority Teacher Scholarship Program Committee.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 6-82-1506(h)(2), concerning the Critical
Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program Committee, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Perform other duties or functions regarding the Critical
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
Needs Minority Teacher Scholarship Program as may be requested by the
chancellor.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 16-123-338(4), concerning relief for a
discriminatory housing practice, is amended to read as follows:
(4) Subject to § 16-123-339, any permanent or temporary
injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, including an order
enjoining the defendant from engaging in the discriminatory housing practice
or ordering affirmative other action as may be appropriate.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 21-3-101 is amended to read as follows:
21-3-101. Equal employment hiring program.
(a) Every state department, agency, board, commission, and institution
of higher education and every constitutional officer as defined in Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 56, § 1, shall adopt and pursue a comprehensive equal
employment hiring program designed to achieve a goal of increasing the
percentage of minority employees within the state department, agency, board,
commission, and institution of higher education and within the constitutional
office to a level that approximates the percentage of minorities in the
state's population.
(b)(1) Every state department, agency, board, commission, and
institution of higher education and every constitutional officer shall report
to the Legislative Council on June 30 of each year regarding its efforts to
achieve its equal employment hiring program goal.
(2) However, the report required of any institution by § 6-63-
103 may be used in lieu of the report required under this subsection and
shall be filed as provided in this subsection.
(c) The employee handbook or manual of every state department, agency,
board, commission, and institution of higher education and every employee
handbook or manual of every constitutional office shall include the following
statement in describing the equal employment opportunity hiring program
required under this section:
“The State of Arkansas does not discriminate in access to
employment opportunities or in employment or practices on the basis of race,
color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, or genetic
information.”
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
(b) A statement included in an employee handbook or manual under this
section does not affect any preference given to veterans in employment.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 22-9-203(i), concerning the award
procedure for public improvements generally, is amended to read as follows:
(i) No contract providing for the making of major repairs or
alterations, for the erection of buildings or other structures, or for making
other permanent improvements shall be entered into by the state, any agency
of the state, any county, municipality, school district, or other local
taxing unit with any contractor in instances where all estimated costs of the
work shall exceed the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) unless
the bid documents contain statements which encourage the participation of
small, minority, and women's business enterprises and veteran-owned business
enterprises.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-130. Prohibition of discrimination or preferential treatment by
state entities.
(a) As used in this section, "state" means the State of Arkansas, a
city, a county, an institution of higher education, a public school district,
a public special school district, or a political subdivision or governmental
instrumentality of the state.
(b) The state shall not discriminate against, or grant preferential
treatment to, an individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity, or national origin in matters of state employment, public
education, or state procurement.
(c) This section applies only to an action taken after the effective
date of this act.
(d) This section does not:
(1) Prohibit the consideration by the state of bona fide
qualifications based on sex that are reasonably necessary to the normal
functions of state employment, public education, or state procurement;
(2) Invalidate a court order or consent decree that is in force
as of the effective date of this act;
(3) Prohibit an action necessary to establish or maintain
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
eligibility for a federal program if ineligibility would demonstrably result
in a loss of federal funds to the state;
(4) Affect any preference given to veterans in matters of state
employment, public education, or state procurement; or
(5) Preempt state discrimination law or federal discrimination
law.
(e)(1) A person who believes his or her rights have been impacted under
this section may bring a civil action in circuit court to:
(A) Enjoin a violation of this section; and
(B) Recover reasonable court costs and attorney's fees.
(2) In an action brought under this section, if the court finds
that a violation occurred, the court shall:
(A) Award:
(i) Injunctive relief; and
(ii) Court costs and attorney's fees, if the court
may award court costs and attorney's fees against the defendant; and
(B) If the court may not award court costs and attorney's
fees against the defendant, order the Arkansas State Claims Commission to
award court costs and attorney's fees.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 25-36-103 is repealed.
25-36-103. Agency contracting — Diversity.
(a) A state agency shall include in all requests for proposals and
requests for qualifications, language that encourages minority participation
in each request for proposals and request for qualifications issued by the
state agency.
(b)(1) State agency requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications shall take into consideration minority inclusion in the
proposed project.
(2) Requests for proposals and requests for qualifications shall
provide that an applicant unable to include minority-owned businesses may
explain the circumstances preventing minority inclusion.

SECTION 23. DO NOT CODIFY. Report to Legislative Council.
(a) All state agencies shall begin developing a plan to implement this
act immediately upon the effective date of this act.
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
(b)(1) If a state agency has not complied with this act within six (6)
months of the effective date of this act, the state agency shall submit a
detailed compliance plan to the Legislative Council or its appropriate
subcommittee within six (6) months of the effective date of this act stating
the:
(A) Steps the state agency will take to comply with this
act;
(B) Estimated time needed for the state agency to
implement changes necessary to comply with this act;
(C) Individual responsible for overseeing the
implementation of this act; and
(D) Description of the steps the state agency is taking to
address any failure to comply with this act.
(2) The executive head of each state agency shall appear before
the Legislative Council or its appropriate subcommittee at the time the
compliance plan in subdivision (b)(1) of this section is submitted and
provide the following information:
(A) Whether the state agency has been successful in
complying with the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) of this section;
(B) An update on the current status of the necessary
changes;
(C) The ongoing steps the state agency is taking to
address any failure to comply with this act; and
(D) The anticipated date for when the state agency shall
be in full compliance with this act.
(3) If the state agency has not been successful in complying
with this act within nine (9) months of the appearance before the Legislative
Council or its appropriate subcommittee required in subdivision (b)(2) of
this section:
(A) The executive head of the state agency shall appear
before the Legislative Council; and
(B) The state agency shall provide an updated report and
compliance plan to the Legislative Council or its appropriate subcommittee,
including the anticipated date of compliance.
(c)(1) If after one (1) year from the effective date of this act a
state agency has not complied fully with this act, in addition to the
02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011

As Engrossed: S1/21/25 H2/3/25 SB3
executive head of the state agency, the cabinet-level department secretary
overseeing that state agency shall also appear before the Legislative Council
or its appropriate subcommittee to provide an update.
(2) After the appearance under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section, every three (3) months until the state agency reaches full
compliance with this act, the executive head of the state agency and the
cabinet-level department secretary overseeing that state agency shall:
(A) Appear before the Legislative Council or its
appropriate subcommittee; and
(B) Provide an updated report and compliance plan to the
Legislative Council or its appropriate subcommittee, including the
anticipated date of compliance.
(3) A cabinet-level department secretary is in violation of this
act if the secretary fails to be in full compliance with this act within
twenty-four (24) months of sine die adjournment of the Ninety-Fifth General
Assembly meeting in regular session.

/s/D. Sullivan


















02-03-2025 09:30:55 JLL011